a pessimist sees the difficulty in every opporunity
an optimist sees the opportunity in every difficulty
you will face many defeats in life, but never let yourself be defeated

DAR LA VIDA POR LA LIBERTAD 
THE STATE NO PUEDE DAR NADA PORQUE NO PRODUCE NADA
EL ESTADO ES UN ANIMAL

they want to control your vocabulary what you see and can say because if you dont know the words then you can imagine it because you arent conscious of it society cant fix what it cant perceive in addition if you arent thinking about it or allowed to speak about it, you wont develop roots towards it and you wont infect others with your ideas, so by not allowing you to talk about it you cant delve into the mysteries behind it, and you cant plant the seeds on others

the economy is the sum of all the transactions that make it up 

an economy is simply the sum of the transactions that make it up 


back in the day you needed uneducated slaves so that they don't get too smart and rise up against you 
now a days however, jejeje things haven't changed much
you see you need a population of cowards/puppets/dumbasses/sheeps that you can manipulate into doing what you want
you want them to be smart enough to do the job, but not smart enough to know that they're being manipulated
into doing the most hanious crimes in human history - you need them dumb and ignorant so that they follow the orders
thinking that they're being good and virtuous when in reality they're being controlled like puppets by an evil hand
you need sheeps that are too stupid to know they're being manipulated so that they carry out all your evil deeds
but you cant have them smart enough to know that they're destroying society 
you keep the people at the bottom of the pyramid ignorant
but not all, you keep some that keep the rest of the sheep in check
look at the anonymous video 
share story of the monkeys and banana

should i mention that rich love minimum raise increases because they can afford and it kills competition? (maybe on the moni video)
its bad to always be watching tv, specially for kids, because they aren't growing their roots, instead they're downloading the programming on the tv
the things they imagine, the lense through which they see reality, will be shaped by the programming received, and they may be deceived
the world has many religions, but nature knows but one truth, meaning there is one reality, you an imagine it as a root, one correct root
to truth, and the most we can do is try to grow our roots in hopes of running into the right roots and choosing to believe the right ones
but we don't know for sure which roots are correct and which isn't
so theres a reality, we can try to grow our roots into that path but we don't know for sure, we all take different routes
watching tv and entertainment is effectievly hipnotizing if you fall for it

i hope i wrote about how you cant get rich off working you can only work so many hours



mental real estate 


when you learn a new skill you're really growing new roots 

you have to build the mental construct imagine it 

when someone says to use your own brain they're really saying use your own soul to look through the roots, and grow your own thoughts

Friedrich Nietzsche — ‘A politician divides mankind into two classes: tools and enemies.’

planting a seed in someones mind is planting a root

we cannot force someone to hear a message they are not ready to receive. but we must never underestimate the power of planting a seed. 

as they grow more roots sooner or later their soul will have all the wisdom required to look directly at the truth

"I do not advise you what you should believe or not believe. but i do advise you that we all need to learn as much as we can
about everything we can, because one thing i have learned in my life is that most of what we have ever been taught has been a lie."


it all begins and ends in your mind. what you give power to has power over you. work on mastering your mind. don't allow for it to play tricks on you

he who cannot obey himself will be commanded. that is the nature of living creatures - nietzche

lots of people think they're smart with small roots thinking they know it all because they've seen a glimpse, their roots be like one vs a super developed one 


they want to take control of all the pie every sector so that they control everything leaving you at their mercy as a slave 


businesses are like animals, all fighting for their share of the limited supply of cash/pie that is traded daily
rich can kill smaller like darwinism competition lowers prices


think of yourself as a magnet, constantly attracking what you speak, consume, think, feel, and do


in fact (continue this on the quote above) 
you've been lied to about everything! the illiterate of the 21st century will not be those who cannot read or write, but those who cannot
unlearn the many lies they've been taught to believe.  the roots that have been implanted in them - to poison your mind, drift you away, you've been programmed



n you think you look at all your roots


your dreams are real it's your fears that are imaginary - add quote from 

the body will only go as far as the mind allows it too. tame your mind. break your limits


do you have a mind? yes well then use it. stop letting dust enter your mind by keeping it idle. start using it for intentional action
set out a direction and let the power of your mind map out how to get there, what actions to undertake - what thoughts to think 

you have to imagine it, create the roots in your mind and then walk the path
one of those paths will lead to the truth

jake paul fight ticket nonsense
this pass belongs to you this pass belongs to you 
19:00 NFT talk
they can't get back in they can't validate if its his ticket through a screenshot it only works once


climb mountains not so the world can see you, but so you can see the world

MOVING GOLD IS HEAVY AND EXPENSIVE AND YOU CAN CHEAT IT HOW DO YOU PROTECT THERES BEEN CASES WHERE THEY CHEAT ON NIT AND ITS HAPPENED REPEATEDLY
TRADING IN GOLD IS INEFFICIENT NOT FAST HOW TO MOVE 100 TIMES A MONTH
HOW TO PREVENT GETTING RIPPED OFF
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=o_8YfbejM3I&ab_channel=KitcoNEWS

SOME RULER CHEATED EVERY DECADEEEEEEEEEEEEE FOR PAST 4K YEARS

luck is what happens when preperation meets opportunity

the devil wouldn't be attacking you so hard if there wasn't something value inside of you - remember thieves don't break into empty homes - hear that again


ask yourself one quesiton: when you're 80 years old lying in bed looking back at your life, will you regret it? will you regret
not trying - not risking - not chasing a dream that mattered more than anything - failure is temporary, but regret is forever
look forward think back and whatever you do don't let your future self down 


if you are not willing to risk the usual, you will have to settle for the ordinary - jim rohn

"We are what we repeatedly do.  Excellence, then, is not an act, but a habit" - Aristotle

"You must understand that there is more than one path to the top of the mountain"

"It is not because things are difficult that we do not dare; it is because we do not dare that things are difficult." - Seneca

"Everyone wants some magic pill, some life hack, that eliminates the need to work.  But that does not exist.

"The ones who say you can't are too afraid you will"

"Hope never abandons you, you abandon it" - George Weinberg

"First say to yourself what you would be; and then do what you have to do." - Epictetus

"If you fight you might lose, if you don't you have already lost" - Bertolt Brecht

"Give yourself a gift, the present moment"

"Don't be sorry, Be Better"
"Don't ask for better leaders, Be Better People"

"We are more often frightened than hurt; and we suffer more from imagination than from reality" - Seneca

"Victory comes from finding opportunities in problems"

"No man is more unhappy than he who never faces adversity.  For he is not permitted to prove himself"


werner heisenberg
el primer trago del vaso de las ciencias naturales te convertira en un ateo pero al fondo del vaso dios te esta esperando
nikola
el don de los poderes mentales viene de dios divino ser y si concentramos nuestros mentes en esa verdad entraremos en sintonia con ese gran poder

it's always the people who refuse to look behind the curtain who insist there's nothing there. 

"Whatever the mind can conceive and believe, it can achieve" - Napoleon Hill 


Move as fast as fucking possible, do not wait, do not sit on ideas, if you have an idea, put your fucking ass behind it quickly
ideas visit you, they are not here to hang around all the time, ideas are energy that wants to be manifested and actualized so
this energy has its own consciousness, and it will visit people and its just taking a chance visiting different people
that it thinks could help manifest it so if you have an idea on something and you don't act on it the idea
is going to leave you and they'll jump to the next person who will actualize them and then its too late for you
you lost your shot, so if you've got something that you've always wanted to do, fucking do it, trust me, just do it


competition is merely the absence of opression. - frederic bastiat


"We become what we think about most of the time - and thats the strangest secret - this is why thinking is so vital - this is why
a goal is so important - because we will become that" 

hack the matrix with your own dreams

The man who knows where he is going will always win the race against the man who doesn't - before beginning each day
ask yourself how would you like to feel at the end of it 

"I believe the more I study science, the more I believe in god" - Isaac Newton

"We are not human beings having a spiritual experience. We are spiritual beings having a human experience." - Pierre Teilhard de Chardin

life is a game and everyday te toca tirar - mushroom trip

a revolution is the mass awakening of society

at the end of the day you've got to feel some way. so why not feel unbeatable, why not feel untouchable, why not feel like the best to ever do it 

there is a higher law than the law of government. thats the law of conscience 

the nitrogen in our DNA, the calcium in our teeth, the Iron in our blood, the Carbon in our apple pies.
were made in the interiors of collapsing stars. we are made of star stuff

you live in a mirrorverse. your outer world is a reflection of your inner world

You know why those with 9s and 10s at school are going to work for those with 5s and 6s? 
because they are overthinkers and they are not action takers 

those who look outside dream the self is god - eliminate the unnecessary - progress over perfection

opressors can tyrannize only when they achieve a standing army, an enslaved press, and a disarmed populace. - james madison

there are 1500 newspapers, 1100 magazines, 9000 radio stations, 1500 tv stations, 2400 publishers, owned by only 3 copropations 


money is a manifestation of energy and value 

as soon as you are born, you're given a name, a religion, a nationality, and a race. you spend the rest of your life defending a fictional identity

if you're going to die create value


in the end we only regret the chances we didn't take 

your mind is your instrument. learn to be its master and not its slave. 
your mind is your greatest asset, so be very careful what you put into your mind


if video games have taught me anything, its that if you encounter enemies then you're going the right way 

"it is well that the people of the nation do not undestand our banking and monetary system, for if they did,
i believe there would be a revolution before tomorrow morning - henry ford


six important guidelines in life: 1. when you are alone, mind your thoughts 
2. when you are with friends, mind your tongue 3. when you are angry, mind your temper 4. when you are with a group, mind your behavior
5. when you are in trouble, mind your emotions 6. when god starts blessing you, mind your ego

always try to remember that if you are trying to have a conversation with someone that watches a lot of tv...
that you are actually trying to talk to a hypnotized person 

sometimes people dont want to hear the truth because they don't want their illusions destroyed

flag worship, cause making people bow to a golden statue is a little too obvious


what fascinates me is that hardly anyone is wondering what we're actually doing on this planet. most accepted the work-eat-entertainment-sleep cycle as 
life and have no desire for a deeper understanding of our purpose in this universe


what if i told you that no matter how much information you share with your friends about the corrupt government and our liberties
disappearing, 97% just won't care until its too late & only then will they wonder how we allowed this to happen 

Do your research. Fucking read. Stimulate your mind. Challenge yourself. Don't just be a puppet on a string 

the bird born in a cage thinks flying is an illness

we are caged by our cultural programming. culture is a mass hallucination, and when you step outside the mass
hallucination you see it for what it's worth


"say what is true, although it may be bitter and displeasing to people" muhammad

heres a hard to swallow pill truth
your money is fake your food is fake your news is fake your medicine is poison the wars are based on lies to them you are cattle


the universe is giving you signs in your conversations, in music you listen to, in the clouds. pay attention to them and piece them together. you will notice a pattern.


when one person suffers from delusions, we call it a mental illness. when society suffers from them, we call it being normal

we do not receive wisdom. we must discover it for ourself. (it is said that wisdom lies in seeing through things picture)

we live in a world where we can be jailed for feeding the homeless, growing the wrong plant, asking questions that challenge the status quo,
collecting drinking water, recording public servants. illuminati killers. something is seriously wrong with this world

normal isn't coming back so get off your knees and resist because I assure you, what they have planned is far worse than anything they've already done

know yourself as infinite and free


cheers to all the folks who do their own research in the age of information ignorance is a choice

if every day is awakening, you will never grow old. you will just keep growing

There are two types of people in this world:
1) Those who can extrapolate from incomplete data

operation mockingbird was a fully implemented cia program to spread disinformation throughout American media. 
CIA director william colby testified to the church committee that over 400 cia agents were active in the us media to control what was reported
through american mainstream television, newspaper, and magazines. 


"if the american people... ... ever find out what we have done, they will chase us down the streets and lynch us." 
gwh bush interview 1992 june

There's simply no polite way to tell people they've dedicated their lives to an illusion. 


You weren't born dumb, but you've been dumbed down 

Good news is there has never been a better time to self educaate and learn to think critically. Corrupt governments and greedy corporations hate 
an informed and intelligent populous



obsess long enough and your opportunity will come

if you can't manage time for what you want, you are not a man with goals, you're just a kid with wishes


you have to undestand most of these people are not ready to be unplugged

a lazy man gives up in a day. a motivated man gives up in a week. a disciplined man achieves anything he sets his mind to 


to survive in a nation of sheep, ruled by wolves, owned by pigs, you must become a lion 


"Every record has been destroyed or falsified, every book rewritten, every picture has been repainted, every statue and street building
has been renamed, every date has been altered, and the process is continuing day by day and minute by minute. history has stopped.
nothing exists except an endless present in which the party is always right. 


we are not human beings having a spiritual experience. we are spiritual beings having a human experience - pierre teilhard de chardin

roots life past future possibilities picture in favoirtes

the people will believe what the media tells them they believe.

put yourself in places you don't belong. sign up for a marathon. speak on stage. start a company with no experience. 
people will tell you to be 'realistic,' to drag you down to their version of reality. Resist. when you start before you're ready,
reality shifts drastically

they love their chains. they forget all about who they really are. and if you try to remind them, they hate you for it, they feel like
you're trying to steal their most precious possesion 

If you find from your own experience that something is a fact and it contradicts what some authority has written down, then you must abandon the authority
and base your reasoning on your own findings." - leonardo da vinci


most persons are so absorbed in the contemplation of the outside world that they are wholly oblivious to what is passing on within themselves. - nikola tesla


Television is the monster in your home. Its called a program for a reason. Your television - tell a vision - is nothing more than
an electronic mind altering device it has been design to psychologically change the ways you view reality


you want to fucking win in life? fall in love with losing, because most people are scared of it 

our money is fake. our debt is fake. our two party politcal system is fake. most of the stuff we've been told is fake. once you realize
this, what you've thought of as reality begins to look like a cheap set on some ridiculous B movie

the surest way to corrupt a youth is to instruct them to hold in higher esteem those who think alike than those who think differently


an evil man will burn his own country to the ground to rule over the ashes. sun tzu

Looking at the night sky makes me realize how puny and insignificant I am on the cosmic scale. I am the result of 14 billion years of cosmic evolution
i am a thermodynamic miracle. i am the walking universe looking back at itself. meme - theres 2 kinds of people
athiests when you tell them to believe in themselves but theres no peer reviewed scientific evidence for it

you are not responsible for the programming you received in childhood. as an adult, you are 100% responsible for fixing it. 


we open our eyes and we think we're seeing the whole world out there. but what has become clear- and really just in the last few centuries - 
is that when you look at the elector-magnetic spectrum we are seeing less than 1/10 billionth of the information that's riding on there.
So we call that visible light. But everything else passing through our bodies is completely invisible to us. Even though we accept
the reality thats presented to us, we're really only seeing a little window of whats happening. 
show 4d. also all radio stations are playing rn 


it is easier to build strong children than to repair broken men 

if television doesn't influence our behavior, why does it cocst 4.5 million dollrs for a 30 second superbowl commercial

if you teach them lies year after year after year, eventually they will laugh at the forgotten TRUTH.
the party told you to reject the evidence of your eyes and ears. it was their final most essential command 

the perfect dictatorship would have the appearance of a democracy, but would basically be a prison without walls in which the prisoners
would not even dream of escaping. it would essentially be a system of slavery where, through consumption and entertainment, the slaves
would love their servitudes. 

A WAR IS EMERGIN THE ONLY WAY TO FIGHT BACK IS TO THINK

la forma de adorar a dios es convirtiendote en la mejor version de ti 

if knowledge were a tree my roots dig deeper in the search for truth - use your roots to dig deeper for/into truth

there is something inside you clip** 

once you see how its all made up its hard to go back to the game

the man who says he cant vs man who says he can are both right - if you believe it will work out you'll see opportunity - energy universe

our thoughts and feelings, have an electromagnetic reality. manifest wisely. go to heaven or hell ->you know how they say that.

fiat = promise to pay

imagine how valuable your soul must be. that the powers of heaven and hell are willing to fight countless battles to win it. 

the obedient always think of themselves as virtuos rather than cowardly 

to denigrate something as "conspiracy theory" without having fully investigated the data is an act of cowardice. you cause
an affront to those who offer the possibility that harm is being done to innocent people, just to avoid confrontations with
your own fears of it being true. 

don't let truth offend you, let it change you.  You are consumed. You are the product of television

everyone is my teacher. some I seek. some I subconsciously attract. often I learn simply by observing others. some may be completely unaware
that i'm learning from them, yet I bow deeply in gratitude


appear weakk when you are strong, strong when you are weak - vawsen

33
the most beneficial technology being hidden from humanity is the power of their own consciousness

"and those who were seen dancing were thought to be insane by those who could not hear the music

you dont believe you exist? believe in yourself u atheists

people want power money to feed fam, control economy = power

no coinsidencias albert einstein - explaim critical thinking - you dont own money at bank leave pride

Meditating is God talking to you. Praying is you talking to God. Affirmations are you talking to the god in you.

"I do not fix my probvlems. I fix my thinking. then problems fix themselves."

Once you realize the power of your tongue, you won't say just anything.
When you realize the power of your thoughts, you won't entertain just anything.
And once you realize the power of your presence, you won't be just anywhere.

Bruce Lee Once Said:
"You will continue to suffer if you have an emotional reaction to EVERYTHING that is said to you. True power
is sitting back and OBSERVING everything with logic. 

Did you know? Your brain will constantly rewire itself to suit the information that you feed into it. If you constantly complain,
gossip, find excuses, etc; it will make it much easier to find things to be upset about, regardless of what is happening around you. Likewise,
if you constantly search for opportunities, abundance, love, and things to be grateful for, it will make it much easier to find a reflection 
of those things around you. It takes practice, but over time, this is a very powerful way to reshape your reality

if you are unwilling to questino your beliefs - You will never know if you are following the truth or lies. (explain this with roots
you dont question roots given to you, and ignore the rest, you don't question which mental route to take) 


imagine the best case scenerio for all situations. your mind will start to attract solutions

every night before going to sleep - we must ask ourselves - what weakness did I overcome today

in the end, when its over, all that matters is what you've done 

everyone must choose one of two pains: suffer the pain of discipline - or the pain of regret 


when soul is fierce, heart is brave, and mind is strong, you become invincible



"Never was anything great achieved without danger"


one day your life will flash before your eyes - make sure its worth watching


have the courage to use your own mind- think your own thoughts - and live your own life 

we are machines hungry for meaning and purpose yet destined to look for it in a universe


imagine the best case scenerio for all situations. your mind will start to attract solutions

words are like keys - if you chose them right they can open any heart and shut any mouth 

do it or dont do it you will regret both 

you can only be conscious of what you know


why would i settle for less when I can have exactly what i want 

you gotta grow roots towards the goal
imagine different realities
one of those surely must be true


you are the bleaming light of consciousness looking through all those roots, all those paths

explain multiverse 
explain energy
explain frequency

you become conscious from your memories, you can't be conscious if you have no data 
you load up memories like ram 





win in your mind and you will win in your reality

because you are trained/conditioned to be obedient and not question/confront authority in school as a kid when you are in theta/downloading
because for the first 7 years you are theta downloading software to then become conscious and do stuff with that software
"standing up to 'authority' makes most people uncomfortable. wether that authority is an idea or a person
people don't want to make waves, and don't want trouble. they want to 'get by', and take the safer road.
they don't want to put themselves at risk. they don't  even want to tell the truth, or even know the truth, if it means
they must go against the tide. and that is why tyranny happens 

the eyes are useless when the mind is blind

millions of people never analyze themselves - they are mechanical products of the factory of their environment pre occupied 
with breakfast lunch and dinner working and sleeping and going here and there to be entertained people will go on being robots 
conditioned by their environment - true self analysis is the greatest art of progress 
I think thats what the true point was when in church you are told to be quite kneel and make a connection with god at church 

lazy person thinks he's working too hard - and successful person thinks he's isn't working hard enough - and we're doing 20 times
the work than they are and we're like aw i could have done more could have done this this saturday should have taken that call
should have flown there - we have guilt about it - they don't give a solitary fuck - and even if you pointed it out to them
they'd sit there and go oh yeah they'd make some excuse for it and then go back to being a loser 

everything you see is frequency - highest is light and lowest is darknest and physical matter is somewhere right in the middle
consciousness is the mind of god and everything you see 

islamic christianity and buddism they tell you this its an illusion but you have to participate as if it is real
you have to find the beauty in it - you are creating reality while you're living it - you are god - the father and I are one
its like trying to tell you simultaneously - yes its meaningless but you 
invest it with meaning you create purpose the tao you are the path that you are walking 


the observer is not separate from the object observed

the only thing worse than not thinking is thinking like everyone else


what happens to you when you are dead? 


kyour soul is programmed by others when watching tv your soul grows and its being watered and they are putting roots in you literally forming your soul
and your soul is growing groomed and its not yours and when you encounter problems you use your roots to make sense of the world or try and grow 
new roots - the roots someone else programmed into you you need to always question your roots your roots are your thoughts 
question everything you are pure awareness onsciousness god do not identify with your roots, use them to learn about the world, everyone is a root 
you become like the people you hang out with you develop their roots thats why you sometimes meet people in defferent bodies as the same person 


your soul is of course fundamentally the total universe


if a company fails its because they aren't providing/creating value
if someone creates value someone is going to want it etc etc. (for another video - incomplete quote i came up with to work on - also people
would make more money if they made things to help others rather than to make money - thats why businesses fails)

chinese language danger oppportunity crisis

it is ok that you have made mistakes - life didn't come with instructions

a person should not agree today with what he will regret tomorrow

confidence is built by facing what you fear
skate

heres the big challenge of life
you can have more than you've got because you can become more than you are
& of course the other side of the coin reads - unless you change how you are - you'll always have what you've got

don't worry about the things you can't control and focus on what you can 


study from  yourself - be your own teacher and your own student 

you've already wasted a lot of time ;) (to end the video) 


Rule your mind or it will rule you 


if you zoom out and look at the evolution of money you'll see that coins turned to paper ious and now those paper ious have turned digital

and now they're making crypto currencies as ious and they have value because people believe in it

the biggest mistake people make is doubting themselves clip/quote from saved videos 
"refusing to learn any new skill unless you're immediately good at it, is a form of self-sabotage. give yourself the mental
freedom to enjoy the process, as much as the results.  Be humble, be teachable, and always keep learning because life never stops teaching
when you achieve the results what makes it worth/feelgood is the process, thats what life is about, if you get everything the moment you want it
then whats the point of living 
learning/growing

sometimes people don't want to hear the truth because they don't want their illusions destroyed

if you are the smartest person in the room, then you are in the wrong room

plan for what is difficult while it is easy, do what is great while it is small


when something bad happens, you have 3 choices - you can either let it define you - let it destroy you - or you can let it strengthen you

don't rush the process, trust it, great things take time

your past is a place to learn and grow, not a place to live 

dream as if you'll live forever - live as if you'll die today 


attach yourself to what is spiritually superior - regardless of what other people think or do - 
hold to your true aspirations no matter what is going on around you


you have to make the rules - not follow them 


take a deep breath, its just a bad day not a bad life 


life is not matter of hodling good cards - but of playing a poor hand well


what is impossible with men is possible with god 


there are no mistakes in life - just lessons 

the only person you are destined to become - is the person you decide to be 


in the middle of chaos lies opportunity 

mistakes are always forgiveable if one has the courage to admit them


be tolerant with others and strict with yourself 

when you are favored by god - you're also favored by the devil
if god is within you, so is the devil

stop waiting for the right time - time isn't waiting for you 

do not mind anything that anyone tells you about anyone else - judge everyone and everything for yourself


believe in yourself and all that you are know that there is something inside you that is greater than any obstacle


to the pessimist the glass is always half empty - to the optimist the glass is half full
why would the same measure affect people 2 different ways answer: it all depends on how you look at it our lifes are mostly affected by the way we think
things are, not the way they are, the way we think they are affects us the most. Better thinking habits one of the major things shouve taught me when i met
him, he said poor thinking habits keeps most people poor, not poor working habits, most people work hard but they don't think hard 
and chauffe taught me that the mind is like a factory - a mental factory and whatever you think about all day long pours ingredients into this mental factory 

self hypnosis
reality exists in the mind of god
god is at the bottom of the glass waiting for you
quantum physics brings the observer into the equation
the universe is the mind of god

god is the highest form of consciousness your mind the source of all creatino the universe
absolute scarcity


have the courage to use your own mind think your own thoughts and live your own life

Do it or don't do it - you will regret both

turn your wounds into wisdom

skate exampe

if you dont create a routine 

everything is energy
prove universe with energy laws 

the mind is like a parachute pic


vegeta clip?: 
el cuerpo es esclavo de la mente - la mente es esclava de los pensamientos - y los pensamientos  son esclavos de nuestras actitudes
aquellas con las cuales enfrentamos las circumstancias de la vida - cuando hablamos de tener una actitud positiva - hablamos
de tener confianza en uno mismo - y cuando tienez confianza en ti mismo - tus pensamientos controlan tu mente - y tu mente controla
tu cuerpo - if god with you ;) who against you 

tate example on beach

world teaches you to look outside
look inside believe in yourself
you are putting on a show for the gods

if god is consciousness in contrast the devil must be unconciosuness 
creation destruction
we see that in the world

the movie the matrix is is people being used for their body heat and their mind is living in a false reality and they keep them occupied
what is the difference now? we're all out here working jobs being used for our body heat, living inside a version of reality which is
objectively false, they will tell you theres things happening that aren't happening, they will tell you to be afraid of things that you 
shouldn't be afraid of, they will tell you a fucking giraffe is a horse and you have to ignore your own eyes and absorb it and accept it
the whole world is fake everything is fake 

man conquers the world by conquering himself


there is no light without without dark, theres no warm without fucking cold, sometimes its cold
thats how life works, you ever experience any fucking pain in your life you'd understand that you sit here
in the cold and you shiver and you think of it doesn't matter because soon i'll be cold

reality is pure imagination
just listen to your inner voice

"if you want to find the secrets of the universe - think in terms of energy frequency and vibration"-tesla


everyday you have two choices - give in to your impulses, cave to cheap dopamine, and hold yourself back 
or be discipline - and stick to the plan - and do what you need to do - its not easy - but thats why it creates results 

fear exists not to stop you, fear exists to make you STRONGER and BRAVER.  Approach every problem with the attitude that its happening to help you grow 



what is a mistake - everybody will do something which will go wrong - making something wrong the first time is not a mistake - it is your chance to
correct it. but making the same situation over and over wrong again and wrong again because your unwillingness to learn something from it - that is the mistake


ganar es no tener miedo a perder. la mayoria de la gente no ha cometido suficientes errores.  o continua cometiendo los mismos errores una y otra vez 
sin errores y sin aprendizaje, no ocurre nada magico en la vida. Los ganadores se caracterizan porque pierden.  Mas frecuente que los perdedores. 
Los perdedores son perdedores porque no estan dispuestos a equivocarse. Sin riesgo no hay ganancias.  & cuando uno asume riesgos 
muchas veces las cosas no salen como uno desearia.  Hay que mirar hacia adelante y seguir insistiendo.  Los perdedores evitan el fracaso & precisamente 
El fracaso convierte a los perdedores en ganadores.  Gran parte del exito reside en como se manejan los fracasos a lo largo del camino.  
la clave esta en 3 patas: Humildad para admitir los errores.  Inteligencia, para aprender de ellos, y disciplina para corregirlos.  



in hindu mythology they say that life is a drama its a big act behind this big act is the player or the self playing a game you can take the attitude that
all this is terrible or that it is dreadfully serious, you see you can play comedies you can play tragedies histories and romances and all that kind of thing
and you can take these various attitudes to it now if you know that this is in away an illusion you can allow yourself to get involved in life to the
most ridiculous degree 

you are god in human form. don't diminish your power, embrace it. 
have you ever felt like you're part of something bigger? thats because you are
you're that missing piece of the universe and you have a purpose
you play a role
theres no __ without __


for just a second think about your dream life, imagine it, feel it, now come back and listen to what i'm about to say
you have the power to make all of that happen

if you cannot control your own mind, then you are just a feather in the wind of life because your own mind is the only thing you can control
you can't control the weather you can't control other people you can't even control wether your heart stops beating you might have a 
heart attack tomorrow - you can't control anything besides what you think.  if you cannot control your own mind then you go throughout life with
zero control zero influence you can't control anything you're just a feather in the wind waiting for life to blow you from happy place to sad place


big dreams require healthy habits and healthy habits require self discipline

everyone is living a unique life path
time your heart broke
girl who did it
parents you have places you lived when you moved around as a kid the teacher who put you in detention and you cried
god has provided you with a lot of trauma for you to grow and learn
the people who never grow and learn are people with easy lifes


in the matrix theres an artificial reality a computer generated reality & people are being harvested for their body heat in a real world
and their minds are occupied by this computer generated reality. We live in a world where people are being extracted for their value
their physical value, and your mind is constantly distracted by garbage, its distracted by tv shows and concerts and the reason i call it the matrix
is because a false reality is being projected onto humanity 


tu voz interior siempre tiene el mismo volumen
y puedes escuchar esa voz, pero no existe
nomas te la estas imaginando...

its time you realize that you have something in you more powerful and miraculous than the things that affect you and make you dance like a puppet

to live life you need problems, if you get everything you want the minute you want it whats the point of living?
embrace hardship

realize you are everything, and that there is no real you involved in the first place
it sounds like well thats totally fucking threatning man i can't i can't not be me i've built this construct from the time i was given a name 
and its just ideas, just ideas
so you see in the deeper senseof play. the intense situations. personally... socially... and so on... that we are all involved in are seen not as
bad illusions but as magnificent illusions so well acted that they have just about got most of the actors fooled so that they have forgotten
who they are and man thinks of himself as a little creature that comes into this world which is all strange and foreign and he's just a little puppet
of fate and he's forgotten. 



not peace but a sword
attach yourself to what is spiritually superior, regardless of what other people think or do, hold to your true aspirations no matter what is going on around you

la verdadera inteligencia sabe que no existen limites. que los limites existen unicamente en la mente de quien los concibe.  
nuestra mente es infinita pero nuestras creencias, conocimientos inconscientes nos encadenan. asi añadia la logica te llevara desde a hasta b . la imaginacion
te llevara a todas partes 

nature has given us a hint, when you fall aleep at night, the activity of your own mind appears as a physical world from the perspective of a separate subject 
of experience in that world.  Now just go up one level, and consider that what appears to us as a physical world is the activity of a universal mind
or consciousness. whose nature is consciousness not matter. but it only appears as physical matter when perceived through the sense perceptions 
of a separate subject of experience within that world. 

if you can dream it, you can do it


what does it matter if you can win a thousand battles if you cannot win against your corrupt passions?...
it doesn't matter. The real battle is with ourselves.

step by step - walk the thousand mile road (followed after the 10,000 hour)

no man is free who is not a master of himself

in the end, when its over, all that matters is what you've done

you have to die a few times, before you can really live

the comfort of the rich depends upon an abundant supply of the poor


if you are ruled by mind you are a king; if by body, a slave


theres a difference between a spiritual person and a religious person
a spiritual person does not need a church for the home and temple of god 
they find their souls in is the church and they keep it clean and how they
keep it out of ignorance and what they do with it shows their manifestation 
of the gods life, for the other they need a religious fervor and constantly reminded
because they do not have quite the soul that is arisined to the point where they can
again manifest the creator within them so they constantley have to remind themselves as the herd come together
to give themselves the strength to carry on that is changing thats why you're going to find the church
being attacked like never before and leaders in false churches falling like never before 
because man must learn he must not go to a church, he is the church 

Be present in the moment and pay attention
pay attention not only to the words but the tone of voice, facial expressions, and body language
imagine yourself in their situation and try to picture what the speaker is saying


the vibration that that the mind and body are in is going to dictate what you attract
because when you put yourself in a vibration what you're really doing is putting yourself on a specific frequency
thats what you do when you set a goal.  most people just set a goal and wait for it to happen. 
its never going to happen. you've got to assume that its already happened. mentally its already happened
you've got a picture of it in your mind. mentally its already happened. 
its happened because i've got the idea in my conscious mind.  if i didn't have the idea in my conscious mind
i couldn't talk to you about it.  the very fact that i can talk to you about it means that i've already got it
now the trick is to stay in that frequency. most people look at the results and they let the results dictate
the frequency they're on. thats why they keep getting the same results 

most people hate maths, but this subject is really the language of the universe and you can't deny this reality.  
planet neptune which is next to uranus and the last planet in our solar system was discovered using mathematics
astronomer


la insistencia sistematica e inteligente - es la llave del exito
ron skolastico apuntaba
si todos los dias vas a un arbol muy grande y le das 5 achazos finalmente tendra que acabar cayendo
no se trata de hacer cosas extraordinarias puntualmente si no de hacer cosas ordinarias todos los dias
la constancia es un factor clave del exito - el expertismo o profesionalismo en cualquier area es cuestion
de horas de dedicacion - asi lo revelan diferentes investigaciones que señalan que ser un referente en cualquier
disciplina exige 10,000 horas de trabajo duro - y hay 2 enemigos que nos alejan de este objetivo.  
el primero: ir saltanto de un asunto a otro sin llegar a dominar ninguna disciplina
y el segundo: tener prisa por alcanzar resultados 
en definitiva: la ausencia de de foco y la falta de pacencia nos alejan del objetivo

"Excellence is never an accident it is always the result of high intention, sincere effort, and intelligent execution
it represents the wise choice of many alternatives. choice not chance, determines your destiny.

"I hold it that a little rebellion now and then is a good thing, and as necessary in the political world as storms in the physical" - Thomas Jefferson


porn is free because you pay with your soul 
A man who lacks purpose will distract himself with pleasure

A big mac doesn't cost $5, it costs your health
Netflix doesn't cost your $15, it costs your time
Social Media isn't free, it costs your focus
Porn isn't free because you pay with your soul
there is always a hidden fee


Albert Einstein "True sign of intelligence is not knowledge, but imagination"


learn to break out of the rope
once this elephant who grew up with his ankle attached to a rope and he could only move round in circles
He had it on since he was born and even 50 years later even though he is well capable to break the rope he chooses not to
the reason being is because his limits have been set he thinks its impossible

They need us to be worker ants
Little slaves who do all the work
There are more of us than there are of them
How do they keep us in control?  By dividing us by race and ideologies 
look at america, all you hear is black white black white all they talk about race why do they do this?
because if all the people woke up, and realize it doesn't matter that he's black he's white and he's mexican
we're all poor and that one guy is rich -  now the rich people are in trouble
so instead they make sure all the poor people fight each other. millionaires and billionaires don't care about race
skin color, they talk about race all the time to keep us divided, because if you have people if you have a common people
with a single ideology they're harder to control, if everybody thinks about their own selves and hate this person that person 
then they're much easier to control 

as a kid I wondered why there was so many us currencies - now i understand that the paper notes were just promises of paying gold/silver and
basically if your paper note is worth x amount of silver/gold then you can go exchange it for the metal then exit your currency and deposit
your metals at another bank with different currency and now you have papers againn but different currency - so the promise to exchange the notes
for metals was what gave them value because you can exchange into metals and back into any other currency if need be and the whole world works on metals
but if the bank failed you lost all your money 
xrp is pretty similar 

you learn nothing from life if you think you're right all the time 


in a global economy where currencies are measured only against each other 
countries are able to artificiaally lower the value of their own currency making their industries more competitive 
a country with a weak currency can make products chaeper causing industrial entire centers to move over seas


a lot of people have been buying the dollar as a safe haven - whne they find out theres no safety there - in fact they need a safe haven from the dollar
right now the dollar is benefiting from the fear trade - but what if the fear trade is afraid of the dollar 

this isn't a problem facing the us alone as it appears in the surface - but with so many countries hodling their savings in government bonds - 
a loss of confidence in the dollar could trigger a global crisis which would affect every nation on earth 

and if someone is credit worthy they can put money into their account they don't need your money 

new money is debt and its not taught in economics class

401k - paychecks - bank accounts - that loan to bob - credit card debt - home loan - all began as digital money created by the banks - the entire
system is based on trust - trust on the banks solvency - trust on the debters ability to repay their debts - if all bank customers demanded just 3% of their
deposits right now in cash this run on the banks would reveal the truth - almost none of that paper currency that you think is in your bank account
exists - it never did 


even though we aren't hunters and gatherers fighting lions and chasing mamoths - we are still fighting for resources and make enemies out of each other

you know how textbooks show you how cheap things used to be? thats proof that the value of the dollar is losing value every dayyyyy get assets

everything is math theres an equation to manifest everything we are embedded into the nature of reality we are the universe coming alive the gods 
we become what we think about most of the time and thats the strangest secret thats why thinking is so vital and we dont let ourselve be bored thats when
best ideas come - thats why goal is so important because we will become that - 

businesses are organisms
governments are organisms
nneed money
deprogramming starts with critical thinking and analyzing what you are watching never blindly believing what you are told 

you need these economics systems for tech innovation - otherwise you will never eat sirloin you only eat whats in your farm 

when currencies are no longer backed by anything tangible - their value are measured against each other only - and because coutries with weak
currencies can make products cheaply countries devalue their currencies to make themselves trading partners favroable/ disereable - if dollar goes down
other central bsnks respond to that to try and make the impact not great on their economies 

the economy is composed of two types of people - producers and consumers - so you either make businesses to bring resources to you or you stay poor as an employee
employers and employee - once you allocate enough resources to retire you can retire 

nothing in nature lives for itself. rivers don't drink their own water, trees dont eat their own fruit the sun doesnt shine for itself
a flower's fragance is not for itself - living for each other is the rule of nature

a nations gereatest war is with itself - ray dalio
over wether or not it can make the hard decisions needed to sustain success
earn more than we spend
treat each other well
strong education inventivenenss (technology) competitiveness - economic output - world trade - military strength - financial center - reserve currency 

get on program so lets get fit and improve our vitals ourselves individually and collectively lets all improve  

leadership capabilities
education levels
character/determination
rule of law
corruption
resource allocation efficiency
openness to global thinking 

if  you want freedom you need to understand how the economy works so you can set up streams of income to you so that you don't have to work anymore
and have cash flowing in - most people if they stop working their cash flow would end and thats how much they're truly worth -
the rich don't work for money 

1980s per capita income was 40 times than that of chinas and we started borrowing from them 
that is a sign of a weakening empire 
as rich  borrow more than countries that save more - chinese wanted to save in dollars because its the world reserve currency
if empire runs out of lenders people hodling currency begin to get out 
people hodling currency look to sell rather than to buy save lend and get in - that will lead to the wealth shift to xrp hodlers
the decline - comes from internal economic weakness with internal fighting or costly external fighting or both - decline comes gradually then really sudden
when empire can no longer borrow the financial bubble bursts and ithas to chose print more money or collapse
when theres economic downturn and debt really arge and cant borrow more to pay debt the bubble bursts
this creates hardships domestic and has to chose between defaulting on debts or print more money - it always chooses to print a lot of money first
gradually then massively - devaluing currency and raising inflation - so they implement socialism
similarly 3 cycles ofdebt finance  boom and busts since  90s with central banks stepping in each time with stronger measures to save the day 
when government has problems funding itself - when there are bad economic conditions - and living standards for most people are declining 
and there are large wealth values and political gaps internal conflict between the rich and poor as well as different ethnic and racial groups 
grealty increases so they push propaganda to hate your neighbor so you let your steam off on them instead of the system itself thats why god
said love thy neighbor he was serious about that he meant that - this leads to political extremism manifests as populism of the left or the right
those of the left seek to redistribute wealth while the right seek to keep wealth on the hands of the rich - as taxes on the rich rise the rich
move to other places assets and currencies they feel safer in - which the outflows reduce the empires tax revenue - whcihc leads to a classic
self re enforcing hollowing process - when the flight of wealth gets bad enough governments outlaw it and those seeking to get out begin to panic
these turbulent conditions undermind productivity - shrinking the economic pie and causes more conflict about how to divide the shrinking resources
populists leaders emerge from both sides pledging to take control and bring about order -thats when democracy is most challenged because it fails
to control the anarchy - which is when the move to a strong poplist leader who will bring order to the chaos is most likely - as conflict within
the country escalates it leads to a civil war or revolution to redistribute wealth and force the necessary big changes - this can be peaceful but more often is
violent -like the roosevelt revolution was peaceful and maintained the internal order - while the french revolution- russian - chinese revolution- were
much more violent and led to new internal orders - this internal conflict makes the empire weak and vulnerable to rising external rivals
seeing this domestic weakness are now more inclinded to challenge - this raises the risk of great international conflict specially if the rival has 
built a comparable military - defending self against rival requires great spending which has to occur as domestic resources are deteriating 
since there is no viable system for peacefully adjudicating international disputes - resulting in tests of power - as 
bolder challenges are made - the leading empire is faced with difficult choice  - fight or retreat - 
fight and lose is worst outcome but retreat is bad as it cedes progress to rival and signals weakness to countries considering which side to be on 
poor economic conditions cause more fighting for wealth and power leading to some kind of war - wars are costly - prpoduce the techtonic shift to  
create new world orders - when those holding the reserve currency of the declining empire lose faith themselves that marks the end  as they sell
marking the end of a cycle - of the 750 currencies that existed since 1700 less than 20% left exist and all have been devalued 

how can we use crypto to stay superior ? 


talk about things that describe health of rise and fall of empires to study it 

to understand whats coming at you 
Ray Dalio said "To UNderstand whats is coming at you - you need to understand what happened before you
history rhymes and repeats
roaring 20s bubble -> 30s depression
2007 bubble 2008 crash 2009 bitcoin 

if printing stops military stops - they're not gonna allow that to happen - you need money to live/work/buy food/resources so soilders wont stop if they get payed

democrats want socialism

1930-1945 was the last change of world order and out of it came the breten woods agreement1944 we have nukes and super power
reserve currency is a currency that is commonly accepted around the world having one in a country is a key factor in a coutry
becoming the richest and most powerful empire - with new dominant power and monetary system established a new world order begins
which is just way of doing things explain mason

1. win power by gaining more support than opposition
2. consolidate power by converting, weakening, or eliminating the opposition so they don't stand in their way

peace and growing prosperity - broard support of leadership great clearly dominant 
leaders design excellent system to raise countries wealth and power

to do that you need strong education - strong character - civility - and work ethic - usually taught in family school and religions

hcreates ealthy respect for rules and laws - order within society low corruption - enables people to unite behind a common purpose and work well together

shift fromt producing basic products to innovating and creating new technlogies  - become superb educated dutch times - created ships to travel over
world to collect great riches - capitalism to finance those voyages 

you can't be great if you're stuck on the bottom following the herd slave to your impulses - you only pursue human hungers when you're not intoxicated
on bread and circuses 

they enhance their thinking by being open to the best thinking in the world
people become more productive - more competitive - shows in their output - and rise in share of world trade 

as countries trade more globally they must protect their trade routes and foreign interest from attack so they develop great mlilitary strength 

if done well this leads to strong income growth - which can be used to finance education, infrastructure , research and development 
nation needs systems to empower wealth takers/creators incentivize and empower those - capitalism is the best system most successful empires
use this approach to develop productive entrepreneurs even china 

lending bond and stock markets allows people to convert their savings into investments to fund invention and development and share in the successes of those
that make great shit happen 

dutch had the first publicly listed company (created) the dutch east india company and the first stock market to fund it 

250 years between leading powers 

amsterdam when dutch - london when british - new york now - china is developing 

successful empire needs military government and capitalists to work together
as country becomes largest international trading empire its transactions can be paid with its currency making it the global medium of exchange
widely accepted and frequently used - people want to save in it - making it the preferred store hodler of wealth- making it the world reserve currency
Guilder dutch pound british dollar usa china yuan - xrp 

countries lend because weak currency means cheap economy so people want to trade with your country 

without reserve currency people don't want to lend you xD
and whem empire runs out of money - they just print more remember 1971? later this year 
privilige of the world reserve currency - this increase borrowing leads to financial bubble 

reserve currency allows an empire to borrow more than other countries 
huge advantage as people all over the world are eager to save - literally people exit their currencies into dollars thats why it remains strong
despite the printing - however watch it collapse as people one day get rid of their dollars to get on xrp 

as people in rich powerful countries earn more - that makes them more expensive and less competitive relative to people in other countries who are
willing to work for less - people in other countries copy the methods and tech of the leading power - leading power loses competitiveness

for example british ship builders had less expensive workers than dutch workers - so they hire dutch designers to design better ships built by less
expensive british workrs making them more competitive which led the british to rise and dutch to decline - similarly we design apple here in usa
or at least thats what it says when you open the box it literally says designed in cali - however its not built in cali

as people become richer they tend not to work as hard - we need workers for society - entrepreneurs - etc. - to create value for the world to trade
but we have a society full of consumers now - work feels like high school sometimes - as people enjoy more leisure and pursue the finer and less
productive things of life - and at the extreme become decadant - values change from generation to generation - during the rise to the top
from those who had to fight to achive wealth and power to those who inherited - they're less battle hardened steeped in luxury accustomed to the
easy life making them more vulnerable to challenges - the golden era of the dutch empire and victorian era of british 
were such high prosperity periods like this - as people get used to doing well they continue betting on good times leading to bubbles
naturally the financial gains come unevenly so the wealth gap grows - wealth gaps are self re enforcing because wealthy use their power
to re enforce their powers - they give priviliges to children like better education and use the political system to give themselves advantages 
this causes the gaps invalues/politics/opportunities to grow between rich ahves and poor have nots - the less well off feel the system against them
but they dont't understand it - resentment grows - but as long as the living standads of people are rising this doesn't lead to revolutions 
doesn't boil into conflict - having world reserve currency inevitable leads to large borrowing and debt with foreign lenders
strengthens short weakenes long 

not everyone can be rich - otherwise where are the workers to keep society alive ? unless you revert back and live in farms - so we need workers
not everyone can be rich tho

when borrowing/spending appears strong but finances weaken and income weakened and so less gdp than produce which leads to printing 
borrow - spend - productive - income - 

maintaining empire becomes unprofitable 

the dutch empire over extended around the world 

they're trying to make a new world order redue the population because that means we need to feed less people require less resources to stay afloat 
i don't agree with mr schwab lets do the impossible - lets expand beyond earth - we need to continue unraveling the mysteries of physics so we can
create technology to travvel the stars and eventually colonize beyond earth - obviously though that doesn't seem plausible as people in other parts of the 
universe will essentially live in different times so our connection would be lost as we cant trade with them - so really we can only stay locally here in our 
solar system but ven then people aren't going to want to go live beyond earth - sowe have to survive with what there is 

perhaps we never decelopt space faring tech because we destroy ourselves before getting there thats why theres no aliens - and would aliesn
really want to come? only if they live foreever because when they return to their homes theres so many years thats gone by 


just as kings hodl all the gold - in 1933 roosevelt made it illegal to hodl all the gold - breaking link to gold allows us to spend more than it earns
simply by printing more dollars - increase in # dollars withot increase in wealth/gold the value of dollars falls
as they enter the market without corresponding increase in productivity - people went to buy stocks gold commodities
1960
1850 britain
1650 dutch
roman empire
when governments spend more than they take in in taxes and conditions get bad they run out of money and need more so they print more 
as they print more they make the prices of everything rise  and value of fiat fall 
when central banks print a lot of money buy stocks, gold and commodities because their value will rise and value of fiat will fall
2008 mortgage driven debt crisis
2020 pandemic crisis




discuss the CPI indicator and how its flawed
what you earn doesnt keep up with hyper inflation 

gold is only traded on wekd ays because someone decided this
you are required to report your gold
its been confiscated
^^ - video of the great reset and rise of bitcoin - 50;00

the only way to lift people out of poverty is through lizaifaire so anyone can start their business
because they need resources to flow to them perhaps grow their own food 

digital currency is here to stay not going anywhere pandoras box has been open what will win crypto or decentralized assets 

willing to face opposition and follow through in the ideas they believe in - the people who try the crazy ideas often fail then people
like to point their fingers and laugh because its easy but every once in a while it works now you're a genius 

regulation can't keep up with innovation 


people without banking accounts will find the most value out of crypto
they don't have bank accounts give examples

theres no banks for bitcoin

in 1971 the united states ran out of money and defaulted on its debts - thats right the U.S. ran out of money
how? well back then gold was the money used in transactions between countries - paper money like the dollar was like
checks in a check book in that it had no value other than it could be exchange for gold - which was the real money
at the time the united states was spending a lot more money than it was earning by writing a lot more of these paper
money checks than it had gold in the bank to exchange for them - as people turned these checks into the bank for gold
money the amount of gold in the US started to dwindle - it soon became obvious that the U.S. couldn't keep its promises
for all existing paper money so people holding dollars rush to exchange them before the gold ran out - recognizing
that the U.S. was going to run out of real money - on sunday evening august 15 president nixon went on television to
tell the world that the U.S. was breaking its promise to let people exchange their dollars for gold - of course he didn't
say it that way - he said it more diplomaticly withot making it clear that the U.S. was defaulting 

* play video of nixon * 

1933 - then paper dollars were also linked to gold which the us was running out of because it was spending more paper money
than it had gold to exchange for them - and president roosevelt denounced on the radio that he would break the countries 
promise to exchange dollars for gold 


when I was a kid I always wondered why all these foreign coins/money wasnt worth anything like the old pesos and what not
turns out the reason they aren't worth anything is because money is backed by promise to pay/exchange for gold
well the financial institutions issuing these currencies no longer exist so you can't take them anywhere to exchange them
for their worth - so that mystery i've solved now that was a mmystery - and like these paper notes only have the value
someone will be willing to give you for them in exchange usually a collector or something - and the coins well if they're
authentic metals they're worth how ever much they weight and the price they go for 


cryptography could bring fairness to elections ?

tor allows to communicate to websites anonymously 

end the fed? seriously? you're not gonna end the fed - bypass the fed clip ;) 

1971


talk about the new world order for sure
take away bias 

good example of lizzaifaire = you need a permit to cut hair why
seriously why - if you don't like how someone cuts your hair you can just never go there again 
the person would lose business if they don't improve

dangers? 

laissez-faire: opposes minimum wages - this would probably make for cheap labor for immigrants looking for any work 
https://www.investopedia.com/terms/l/laissezfaire.asp
we need balance ? you can't make a free decision without an informed

Laissez-faire: a policy or attitude of letting things take their own course, withot interfering 
Abstention by governments from interfering int he workings of the free market 
Laissez-Faire is a type of economic system in which transactions between private groups of people are free from any form of economic interventionism 

Laissez-faire is a French phrase that translates to “allow to do.” It refers to a political ideology that rejects the practice of government intervention in an 
economy. Further, the state is seen as an obstacle to economic growth and development. The term originated in the 18th century during the Industrial Revolution

During the twentieth century, laissez-faire became one of the most influential economic approaches. In the American Gilded Age (1865-1910), laissez-faire was the 
dominant economic doctrine of the U.S. government.

usa grew to be the powerhouse it is because of its freedom - and freedom to transact is the most important freedom 
all rights derive from your freedom to transact just look at justin trudeu 
you cant spend you cant fund your voice protests you cant eat 

talk about failures of prohibition - economic intervention by government which creates black markets 

"If the American people ever allow private banks to control the issue of their currency, first by inflation, then by deflation, the banks and corporations
that will grow up around them will deprive the people of all property until their children wake up homeless on the continent their Fathers conquered....
I believe that banking institutions are more dangerous to our liberties than standing armies.... The issuing power should be taken from the banks and 
restored to the people, to whom it properly belongs."
-Thomas Jeferson
Even if Thomas Jefferson didn't say that - I echoe that sentiment - and I'm sure many other libertarians anarchists like myself do too
thats the most american thing to say
Satoshi Nakamoto is Thomas Jefferson reincarnated


give a man a gun, and he can rob a bank, give a man a central bank, and he can rob a generation


"The market economy succeeds not because some people's interests are suppressed and other people are kept out of the market, but because people gain
individual advantage from it"

"I had to abandon free market principles in order to save the free market system." George W Bush 
https://reason.org/commentary/why-bush-abandoned-free-market/

I do not think it is an exaggeration to say history is largely a history of inflation, usually inflations engineered by governments for the gain of governments 
- fridrich nizche

By a continuing process of inflation, government can confiscate, secretly and unobserved, an important part of the wealth of their citizens

Entrepreneurs and their small enterprises are responsible for almost all the economic growth in the United States - Ronald Reagan

Political Freedom cannot exist withot economic freedom; a free mind and a free market are corollaries


The Free market is not only a more efficient decision maker than even the wisest central planning body, but even more important, the free
market keeps economic power widely dispersed

if you destroy a free market you create a black market - winston churchill
thats how you end up with cartels and mafias
prohibition doesn't work 

There's no limit to what free men and free women in a free market with free enterprise can accomplish when people are free to follow their dream.

We all too often have socialism for the rich and rugged free market capitalism for the poor - martin luther king jr


The advantage of a free market is that it allows millions of decision-makers to respond individually to freely determined prices, allocating resources - labor,
capital, and human ingenuity - in a manner that can't be mimicked by a central plan, however brilliant the central planner. - Friedrich August Von Hayek


The younger generation of today has grown up in a world in which in school and press the spirit of commercial enterprise has been represented as disreputable
and the making of profit as immoral, where to employ a hundred people is represented as explotation but to command the same number as honorable.

Free-Market capitalism is a network of free and volunatry exchanges in which producers work, produce, and exchange their products for the
products of others through prices voluntarily arrived at (Murray Rothbard)


North Korea has a command ecnomoy in which the central government directs the economy regarding the production and distribution of goods
an economic system in which a central government dictates permissible levels of production and prices - 

command economy economics help - 

we are still animals - predators and preys - therefore when shit hits the fan and theres no economic opportunity for advancement - thats where
cannabilism happens 

universal basic income is basically the government controlling the money supply then giving it to people then people decide where to spend it 
but the economy is controlled so they're told where they can spend it and at that point the government is controlling the economy by deciding
where resources flow to where money can be spent or not - and if you don't spend it it just goes back to the government - you can't have people
not working because crops aren't harvested on their own and cows aren't going to suicide themselves for us to eat their delicious steak- 
someone needs to do the work - insects are easy to grow thats probably why they want us to eat insects - we can only buy insects lol
basic income would literally be the government controlling the money and giving you a share then you decide where to spend it but they give you
the imaginary options - imagine universal basic income where they don't tell you where to spend it - you pick where to give value - so the people
with businesses get money flowing in - their money they spend it to pay workers - the workers are fed - the business gets money - the business owner
makes bank - eventually the universal income would have to run out unless you print more - so if you run out they have to go get a job to make
money- but if there is no job what? - 
if they don't run out theres endless inflation ?
if it does run out they gotta go back to work 
if government is redistributing wealth then someone is getting screwed 
hmmm universal basic income doesn't sound like a evry good idea - but how do you compete with businesses that don't need workers because they have robots
how do you live in a society like that
well people can plant food - farmers - thats one source of food
but what about meat ? how do you create value? trading?




the matrix is real. it exists inside the minds of the masses through social, cultural, political, educational& religious indoctrination 

you've been lied to about everything! The illiterate of the 21st century will not be those who cannot read or write, but those who cannot
unlearn the many lies they've been taught to believe 

la forma de adorar a dios es convirtiendote en la mejor forma de ti mismo
cuando haces eso el universo te recompenza por hacer las cosas que naciste/viniste hacer
hay dos fuerzas el bien y el mal, ying yang - tao que puede ser escrito no es el verdadero tao

energy?

the self is god

its ok not to pick a side 

intelligence - not because you think you know everything without questioning, but rather because you question everything you think you know

why would they want to enslave? because panopticon they know they can make a jail to keep you busy and never rebolt and change history
we need working class to keep civilization going - but when theres no economic advancement that turns into slavery



what makes something an asset or a liability is the 2 are the 2 most important words in business - which way is the cash flowing
so an asset if the money is flowing into your income statement its an asset - if money is flowing into your pocket its an asset
if money is flowing out of your pocket its a liability
the average person goes out there and buys a house and then says "oh its an asset" but every month their money flows to the bank 
or they buy a mutual fund or a stonk then their money flies straight to wall street (look for video)

what made america thrive was lizaifaire and 0 taxes - that was very attractive to people looking to start businesses 

do you know why they tell you to put money at the bank? so they can loan it ten times over (put this quote when defining what are banks 

old methods of wealth do not work anymore - saving money makes you poor - in an economy where the money supply is always growing - the smartest
thing you can do is grab some assets and ride the wave up - otherwise you'll just stay poorer and poorer

question everything - I question everything 

will do unethical ?

if everything is made out of energy and you're made out of energy - and energy can't be created or destroyed - then that just means the universe 
has always existed - 

north koreans currency

https://mynzahosiris.wordpress.com/2022/01/20/cannabis-health-medicine-plants/

6:50 https://youtu.be/W2nRn7O4QCo credit cards are debt thats how money is created
================================================================================================================================

Hello World - 

Today we're going to dive into the Occult - which is knowledge held by few - hidden from sight of the masses Most humans will go through their entire lifes 

completely oblivious that such knowledge even exists - Thus never lifting the veil thats been placed over their eyes to blind them from the truth - that they're 

slaves Neo - Wake up - The matrix is everywhere - You were born into a pre fabricated reality - As soon as you're born you are given a name, a religion, a 

nationality, a race a social security number to identify you - just another number in the matrix - As a baby you have a built in natural instinct to trust your 

parents for survival - we label them as authority figures - and by the age of 4 you're placed in a government indoctrination camp where you're presented with a

new authority figure - Teacher - A Puppet whose strings are pulled by the government to tell you what to think, what exists, what doesn't, whats real what isn't, 

deliberately sculpting your perception of reality - But what is real? How do you define 'real'? If you're talking about what you can feel, what you can smell, 

what you can taste and see, then 'real' is simply electrical signals interpreted by your brain - and senses can be deceived - The eye of hours is made up of six 

symbols - each representing our senses - smell, sight, hearing, taste, touch, and thought. In the ancient Vedic system thought is considered to be a sense - 

received simultaneously as sensations or experiences on the body and arise from the same vibratory source - thinking is simply a tool - one of six senses - but we 

have elevated into such a high status that we identify ourselves with our thoughts - the fact that we do not recognize thinking as one of the six senses is very 

significant - we are so immerse in thought that trying to explain thought as a sense is like telling a fish about water - water what water? - The truth is, 

everything we hear is an opinion, not a fact - and everything we see is a perspective - not truth. We should be teaching children how to think - not what to 

think. Schools serve to condition people to become safe law abiding - government trusting citizens. They extrude creativity and critical thinking - discourage 

uniqueness and out of the box thinking - they don't want you to think for yourself During World War 2 Nazi Germany was interested in preparing young children 

for war so Hitler created The Hitler Youth Group to teach young children how to become obedient soldiers - similarly our education system pumps out obedient 

workers afraid of taking risk programmed to Go to school - Get a job - Pay taxes - Save Money - Buy a house because its an asset - Get out of debt - and invest 

in the stock market - its hypnosis going through your brain - The aim of public education is not to spread enlightenment at all, it is simply to reduce as many 

individuals as possible to the same safe level, to breed and train a standardized citizenry, to put down dissent and originality. John D Rockefeller - who 

created our modern education system literally said - "I don't want a nation of thinkers, I want a nation of workers." When the entirety of your earnings are 

exhausted on food and shelter, your labors are no longer viewed as an opportunity for economic advancement, but rather as an act of self-preservation. In the 

real world that's called ... Slavery - this is going to sound a bit deranged - but one day while this lovely man was imagining what the perfect prison would 

be like - you know - casual / typical - he reached the conclusion that not only would you need consistent surveillance of your prisoners - a Panopticon - 

you'd also need to implement a rigid routine in which every second of the day is full of activities - one hour to eat one hour to exercise one hour to go to 

sleep - you'd need to keep prisoners busy - don't spare them a second free to think - because the time they spend eating, working out, and sleeping is time 

they aren't committing crimes or planning an escape - look at it this way - you can only have one thought at a time - and if the mind is always occupied - then 

you'll never plan an escape - this is why the Roman Poet Juvinal wrote "Give them bread and circuses - and they will never revolt" Look the evil isn't in the

bread and circuses per se, but in the willingness of the people to sell their rights as free men for full bellies and the excitement of the games which serves

to distract them from the other human hungers which bread and circuses can never appease - These principles of vigilance and control can be applied at larger 

scales - why stop at a jail when you can apply them to schools, hospitals, businesses, society - as a matter of fact you can have a whole Panopticon country. 

Wouldn't that be terrible ? Look I'm not a criminal, I don't need anyone to control my time to stop me from commuting crimes - but I do commit other activities 

of which I don't feel very proud of which I would like to change for more significant ones you might not be a criminal - but you do have a routine that's 

determined by your relationship and obligations to other people you wake up early so you don't have to deal with a congested highway or a packed metro - and go 

to work where they give you an hour to feed your self and continue working - and then you get home and make the most out of every second of freedom life allows 

you - and the following day you do everything all over again You didn't determine this routine - but the circumstances under which you exist In society its very 

easy to chose the personality that the culture you habit offers you - to become what is expected of you - and your discrepancy between you and the world 

disappears - and with it the fear of solitude and importance - you can become an automaton - or an NPC - a None Playable Character - like the background 

characters in movies or video games whose only purpose is to exist - identical to millions of NPCs at your surrounding - free of all anxiety and uncertainty -

but the price to pay is highly expensive - you must quit being your self The slaves of the new age are not in chains, but in debt - slaves to their impulses - 

mindless consumers - True freedom is DISCIPLINE - the matrix is a system neo - that system is our enemy - guarded by the unenlightened fools around you whoms 

eyes see no further than their own lashes - It is in the interest of tyrants to reduce the people to ignorance and vice - small in imagination - For they cannot 

live in any country where virtue and knowledge prevail - when you look around what do you see? business men, teachers, lawyers, carpenters, all thinking that 

they earn for themselves - believing the money they use is a tool of trade not of control - you have to understand that most of these people are not ready to 

see it - many of them are so invested - so hopelessly dependent on the system that they would fight to protect it - Ignorance has always been the weapon of 

tyrants - Enlightenment the salvation of the free. The brain is mother natures super computer and your conscious is the software its running - Your thoughts 

are mere programs - So you must be wary with what you consume - if you're not careful - you could end up with malicious software running in your head -

which will affect your life - As former Emperor of Rhome Marcus Aurelious once said "The happiness of your life depends upon the quality of your thoughts: 

therefore, guard accordingly... the things you think about determine the quality of your mind - your soul takes on the color of your thoughts" So make sure 

you're the only one doing the programming and repel viruses - You achieve this through critical thinking - Question EVERYTHING - and explore EVERY possible

avenue you can imagine in your mind - like a game of chess - Because even though we're no longer sleeping in the wild among the trees - We're still subject

to predators - Guised as Governments, Businesses, Corporations, Institutions, The Mainstream Media, Influencers - not everyone doing the programming has 

your best intentions in mind - you don't want to be a pawn used to manifest the dreams of others - Critical Thinking is your antivirus - filter everything 

through your own best judgement - it is the mark of an educated mind to be able to entertain a thought without accepting it - so don't immediately accept any 

information as truth, because as you collect more knowledge the truth will unveil itself - but don't cling to truth or knowledge - For Socrates, the wisest 

man to have ever lived said "I am the wisest man alive, for I know one thing, and that is that I know nothing" - be open to the possibility that everything

you know is wrong - because the more you know, the more you know you don't know - Only fools know everything - As Bruce Lee said - "be water my friend" - 

don't turn your brain hard as concrete to the point you can't absorb any new ideas - listen more than you speak - According to Plato - “Wise men speak 

because they have something to say; Fools speak because they have to say something” - So when someone is speaking to you - learn to be in the present - 

shut the mind off and focus - tune into the conversation - you can learn something from the speaker - because every action and every word that comes 

out of the speakers mouth originates as a thought in the brain - so it gives you a glimpse into the workings of their minds and the data they hodl - if 

you're just eagerly waiting for the speaker to shut up so you can say something you already know - you're not listening, therefore you will miss an 

opportunity to learn something from the speaker - remember you can only truly focus on one thing at a time efficiently - So be humble - you can learn

something from everyone - humans are gods robots and everything we know exists as data mind in our minds - When we go to sleep the brain stores new 

information and gets rid of toxic waste. Nerve cells communicate and reorganize, which supports healthy brain function. Neurons in the brain form connections 

that store all the knowledge and memories that create the illusion of you - So everything you learn literally becomes a part of you as neuro connections your 

brain - This is why people get upset when their beliefs are challenged with new information that contradicts what they believe - A mental conflict occurs that 

activates areas of the brain involved in personal identity and emotional response to threats. The brain's alarms go off when a person feels threatened on a 

deeply personal and emotional level causing them to shut down and disregard any rational evidence that contradicts what they previously regarded as 'truth'. 

However truth is not what you want it to be; it is what it is; you must bend to its power or live a lie. Every man is rich in excuses to safeguard his prejudices, 

his instincts, and his opinions - however you must learn to let go of mindsets that no longer suit you - and adopt new ideologies that help you grow - 

learn to unlearn and relearn - The matrix will program you to think its ok getting $100k into debt for a degree that won't pay itself back - and you believe 

it because its encouraged by your parents and teachers - figures of authority who should know what they're talking about right? Look if you can't think - 

I can't help you - you must question everything you've been taught - the slave mind wants only to be ruled, it thinks first to become an employee instead of 

an employer, it can not create opportunities for itself this is why most would work for companies until death yet wont start their own. The free mind builds 

with whatever material available and changes its environment it does not wait for change to occur it creates the change. The free mind needs no boss, employer, 

director nor master because it is not enslaved - the truth is that the Matrix pulling the strings of the people around you - friends and family tend to morph 

into Agent Smith to discourage you from taking risk, investing, or starting a business - This is because society needs slaves to function - and it also keeps 

potentially dangerous people from doing crime by giving them a noble goal to pursue - to become a good law abiding member of society - Just as animals hunt for 

their meal everyday - humans must work to put food on the table - someone needs to hunt and create stuff for people to trade & eat - Otherwise we wouldn't have a 

society - society would collapse without a working class - How would we feed people without farmers? Who would build the roads and buildings without workers?

We work to create value and that forms a society for people to trade goods and services. Cash flows into the pockets of those who create value and solve problems 

- Contrary to what indoctrination camps, schools or jails conditioned you to believe - its ok to make mistakes - they're the fuel for growth - The

successful among us sacrifice and bargain with the future - A winner is just an experienced loser. You don't need to be a walking encyclopedia to be smart - 

you just need a powerful mindset that will get you through anything - its not about how much you know, but how you think that matters - The Law of Attraction 

states that "What you think starts a vibration that influences how you feel, impacts what you attract and creates your reality - so choose your thoughts wisely!"

Why would you have negative thoughts and program your own brain to be against you? As Elon Musk says, "I'd rather be optimistic and wrong than pessimistic and 

right" - Having a pessimistic mindset because "you're just being realistic" doesn't make you smarter than everyone else, it just makes people dislike you - no one 

likes pessimistic people - According to the buddha - All that we are is the result of what we thought - the mind is everything - what we think we become. So if you

correct your mind the rest will fall into place - the body becomes what the foods are: as the spirit becomes what the thoughts are - Words have power - We can cast 

spells over the world by spelling words into existence - we can change the way people think, feel, and act. Watch your thoughts - they become words - Watch your

words - they become actions - watch your actions - they become habits - Watch your habits - they become your character - Watch your Character - it becomes your 

destiny - Not-knowing is true knowledge. Presuming to know is a disease. First realize that you are sick, then you can move towards health - Everybody is a genius. 

But if you judge a fish by its ability to climb a tree it will live its whole life believing that it is stupid. The mind, once stretched by a new idea, never 

returns to its original dimensions. The mind once enlightened cannot again become dark - and in case you haven't figured it out - You are not your thoughts or 

body - and you don't have a soul - you are a soul - you have a body - the self is pure awareness - shining as the light of consciousness - surrounded by the 

senses - only seeming to think and move - according to an ancient Egyptian proverb - consciousness is god and you are the universe looking back at itself - 

Although the universe is infinite - the amount of knowledge that exists is finite - the universe is composed of the same forces of nature everywhere - 

Therefore you can learn and master any skill - there's only so much to learn to learn in any branch from the tree of knowledge - to manifest your dreams into 

reality - Obssess with your goals - put in the work - do the research - and never give up - you learn to tame reality by learning how the universe works - the

world knows many religions but nature knows one truth - and thats that everything is math - taming reality is magic and we're the sorcerers - Math exists - 

Mathematicians discover it - Physicists use it to make sense of the world - and Engineers use physics to create machines - and these machines are used by 

humanity - We're the creators and the universe is our canvas - Those who look outwards dream - those who look inside awaken - The Egyptians wrote "The Kingdom

of Heaven is within you; and whosoever shall know himself shall find it". So believe in yourselves for "The Kingdom of God is within you." - Christ (Luke 17:21).

Whatever the mind can conceive and believe, it can achieve - All things are possible - who you are is only limited by who you think you are - There is no actual

god or Satan. God is actually just a symbol for higher-consciousness, and Satan is a symbol for the ego. You must use higher-consciousness to overcome your lower

ego desires. Your success, mind and body are a reflection of yourself - the human mind is a spark of the almighty consciousness of god - 

Those who deny the Lord deny themselves; Those who affirm the Lord affirm themselves. 

Imagine, if you will, living many lifetimes, in many forms, on many worlds, traveling through eternity. you are it ;) 

***************************************************************************************************************************************************************

Anyways have you ever asked yourself - what is money ? Do you know ? Do you really know? Because most people don't - and consequently spend their entire lifes 

chasing after these magical pieces of papers without ever even knowing what they are! Its preposterous! Its like, everyone knows how to drive a car but only a

few know how it works under the hood - and the same can be said for money - everyone knows how to spend money but no body understands what it is - If you were 

a NASCAR racer - wouldn't you want to know how the car works under the hood so you can best modify your vehicle for the ultimate performance? - So for everyone 

chasing money - wouldn't it be wise for you to understand how money works to maximize your cash flow ? - I've ran some experiments of my own asking people "What 

is money?" and the answers I get range from "oh its a piece of paper" to "its the source of all evil" - however no one seems to get it right these types of

responses are merely descriptions of money and completely miss the bigger picture - not answering the fundamental question - what is money? - If you don't know -

Money as it exists today is just a database - a tool humans created for the purpose of trading wealth amongst each other - thats why its often described as

something valuable we use to trade value - However the story of Money is older than civilization itself - As a matter of fact primates, like the bonobos, are 

using money right now as we speak - they're known to use sex as a form of currency - The Female bonobos trade sex for food and obtain a males favors. Back when 

we were still hunters and gatherers - living in tribes and villages - debts and credits were kept in the head as a mental ledger - A ledger is just a complete

record of a company's transactions over a period of time, documenting changes to assets, liabilities, equity, expenses and revenue. If you want to see a ledger 

yourself with your own eyes - just whoop out your phone and look at your transactions history in cashapp or on your mobile banking app - that history log showing 

all your purchases, balance and expenses is a ledger - hecc even your browsing history can be seen as a ledger - a record with times and dates of all the websites 

you've clicked on - Think of a ledger as a database - holding all the metadata associated with transactions - Early in civilization - barter was cash - For example -

someone would give you their daughter in exchange for some cows - or you could trade some pigs for some chickens - food for raw materials - when trading outside 

tribal villages people needed something scalable that everyone agreed had value - So barter evolved into commodity money and gave birth to market economies -

where economic decisions and pricing of goods and services are guided by the interactions of individuals and business men - producers and consumers - Markets 

are the gathering of people for the purchase and sale of provisions, livestock, and other commodities - while the economy is the wealth and resources of a 

country or region - especially in the terms of the production and consumption of goods and services - Money is the fuel of an economy - used by business men to 

entice workers - and a necessity for consumers to get their basic needs - the characteristics required for money and commodities to be recognized as currency are

that they must be fungible, stable, recognizable, portable, durable, divisible, uniform, with a limited supply, and acceptable. Fungibility means the commodity 

is replaceable or interchangeable with another identical item; with no noticeable difference in quality, not impacting value and utility. Money must obviously 

be portable to move funds around, otherwise how are you supposed to transact? You need to get payed some how right? - It also needs to be divisible to allow 

people to transact value proportionate to how valuable people think something is. Money needs to be durable to stand the test of time and allow for the store 

of wealth. It must be uniform, something everyone can recognize and accept. And most importantly Money should have a fixed supply - turning it into a database

of wealth - look at it this way - imagine all the money in the world is represented by this pie - what you have in your bank or pockets represents a slice of

the pie - a portion of the money and wealth that exists in the world - So do you know what inflation is? Well if money is a database - and all the money in the 

world can be represented by this pie - look closely at what happens to your share of the pie when government prints more money - ... *music playing* ... Woah!

Spooky right? Woah! Thats how inflation works - So now you know printing money is literally taking a slice of your pie and redistributing it - Also known as 

Inflation - If the pie example didn't make sense thats ok - lets look at it another way - you understand fractions right? Lets pretend only 10 dollars exist in 

the world and you own 1 of those dollars - what would happen if one day the government decided one day to print $90 dollars more into existence to fund their 

agendas - instead of owning 1/10th of all the money in the world - you would now own 1/100th of all the wealth that exists in the form of dollars! - Welcome to 

the real world - where the printing never stops - and since everyone is fighting for a larger share of the pie - thats why the price of everything rises - 

your dollars are loosing value every passing second - Currency is an instrument that functions like a common language between people that allows us to trade

value - and for thousands of years - Table Salt served as a form of Currency. The Roman Empire even payed their soilders in salt - Salt was valuable because

it was often difficult to obtain - making it a highly valued trade item - Before Refridgerators were invented - salt was used to preserve food - serving as a 

founding contributer to the development of civilization - salts unique super power ability to lock on to water molecules draws out moisture out of foods - 

and without water microbes and bacteria that cause decay die - and preserves dried food for months and years to come. This enabled civilization to transport 

food over long distances and eliminated the dependence on seasonal availability of food. The Latin word for Salt is Sal - thus the words Salvation, Salary, 

Salami, Sausage - because of salts ability to save food and people . The Aztecs used cacao beans as currency - Whale Teeth in Fiji - Yak Dung in Tibet - 

Shells in Africa and China - grains, metals, ivory, rare stones, leather, fish, if it had the characteristics of commodity money someone probably used it 

as currency - When there is no currency - people make one up - for example children in schools trade toys, tazos, pokemon cards, gum, chips, treats, pencils and

bracelets with each other - and in north korea where people live under extreme poverty - people have no choice but to barter whatever belongings they have 

to purchase food and clothes - money does not originate with governments, money arises naturally as markets begin to develop - as people realize that in

order to trade goods and services they'll need a medium of exchange - if I own eggs and you have a cow - we'll need a medium of exchange for you to buy my

eggs and for me to buy your cow - Similarly in the work force - you exchange your time and service for someone elses money - Although Salt has been a hot commodity 

throughout human history - new salt discoveries could turn economies into turmoil - Coins then emerged from economies as an objective and universal unit of 

account - allowing people to buy and sell goods over vast regions - giving rise to market economies - but coins only worked so long as the people trusted 

that the Kings, Emperors, or Authorities issuing them weren't cheating on the metal content - Gold is GODS money - as such, no series of chemical reactions

can ever create gold - Chemical reactions change the number and shape of the electrons in an atom but leave the nucleus of an atom unchanged - and the

compusure of the nucleus is what identifies what element an atom is - Therefore the Ancient Aclchemist Dream of creating gold by simply reacting chemicals is 

impossible - In Nature, gold is produced when massive stars collapse or dead stars hit each other.  We can make gold in fission reactors, but this is very

expensive high tech that didn't exist in the past, and it costs you more to make gold than it is to just dig it up from the earth - which brings me to the next

point - you can only dig more up - yo ucant turn things into gold i'm sorry - 


its been around

since the earth was created and will remain here after human civilization perishes - Gold and Silver WORK because you can't fake it or make more of it - 

you can't magically change the atomic structure of the things around you and turn them into gold - its very expensive 

the use of coins means that somebody controls the supply of

currency - centralized power over the supply of wealth - instinctively linking money and political power - because money is power - people are willing to

give up time of their lifes to provide you with a service for money - for the vast majority of humans alive today - we're no longer hunters and gatherers - 

we've become dependent on economic systems to survive - we need cash flow to feed ourselves - since people are conditioned to be afraid of taking risk - 

they quickly become complacent with the safe way of life society has to offer them so long as it covers the bills and puts food on the table - and as their

minds are occupied up with their everyday routines - they don't even try to escape - passively accepting wage slavery for the rest of their lifes - and as 

people get older and have families to tend to - they're even less likely to take risk - its just easier to go offer someone your time in exchange for some 

currency than it is to start a business - however the easy route isn't always the best - you don't get ahead of everyone else by following the herd - theres

more people with degrees than ever and I don't see none of these college graduates driving lambos - they don't even know what a financial statement is! The word

"Cash Flow" is absent in their vocabulary! - "business teachers" don't drive McLarens - and people graduating in economics don't even learn what money is!

So what the hell are they even doing? Seriously what is the educational system teaching these people? GARBAGE - Its just preparing you to become an employee 

for someone else - and your diploma just shows an employer that you have the discipline to work 8 hours and be happy with your pay so you won't fuck his

business up and you are happy telling people you achieved your dreams becoming that doctor, engineer, accountant, teacher, or whatever it is you become - 

you can't become rich without increasing your cash flow! Cash flow is what increases your share of the pie of wealth! Starting a business can be difficult - 

especially when powerful business men use their political influence to shape laws and regulation that will stifle innovation - because they're scared

they fear competition because if they go out of business there goes their way of life - competition is bad for the business owners - but its

good for consumers because it brings prices down and drives innovation - but if new laws are created every year - that stifle innovation - without any laws

ever getting erased - what you have is a slowly growing totalitarian state - centralizing control over the economy - You got to understand theres

people in power - in seats of government - who live in the pockets of these powerful business owners - and when The People allow greedy

individuals to control the economy - thats how you end up with Facism and Communism - We need to be careful who We The People allow into seats of power

because their decisions affects all of us - and these corrupticians are living off our taxes and funding from lobbyist - who in turn shape laws for them

in exchange for money - and these government individuals are also scared - they're afraid that if they lose their position of power well there goes

their way of life as well - and power boosts the Ego - Just as Men can't ignore Beautiful Women - Women can't ignore Successful Men - so these

politicians can easily get drunk on power - Look Businesses need Cash flowing in to stay afloat - to pay their bills and workers - to make profits - 

governments on the other hand - don't - ever since we cut our ties to the Gold Standard - Politicians can just fund whatever they want to fund their

agendas, agencies, military, pockets, etc. - therefore a Gold Standard incentivicez discipline on government spending - In the past

if a government wanted to fund new programs and agencies - it needed to tax the people - hence why King Gorge was taxing Americans - because he spent all his

gold funding wars and needed money back - the americans decided taxation is theft - But today governments have power over the money printer - that is no longer

necessary - they just print it - this began as early as World War 1 - 

taxation used to be illegal - starts as temporary - continues forever



look if you can print as much money as you want and have people fulfill your wishes, you're essentially a king and you can buy workers to fulfill your

broke people are easier to control

people scared to quit there goes their way of life and they have wife and house and kids 
wishes - is that not power?  W

people need money to survive

when you can print as much of this magic money to get people to fulfill your wishes - thats power 

and when people are willing to work for yougive up their time for money you can just print fron thin air - thats a form of slavery - 


I care not what puppet is placed upon the throne of England to rule the Empire on which the sun never sets
The man who controls Britain's money supply controls the British Empire, and I control the British money supply
- Nathan Rothschild 

history of rothschilds?


look money is power - because people are willing to give up their time and provide you with a service for money 

people need money to survive - poor are easier to control


because if people will give up their time and service

for money - and you can print unlimited of this money - unlike a business that requires money to flow in to stay afloat - governments around the world

unlocked the super power of printing unlimited money to fund whatever they want and have workers and not worry about going bankrupt 






minting coins in a steady and predictable manner allowed economic growth and stability 

taxes built castles and financed military campaigns and expensive hobbies - soon royal mints were substituting cheaper metals for silver and gold 

this is called debasement and heuropes kings made a habit of it - currency of france was debased every 20 months for 200 years - if no one can trust

the gold or silver content of your coins how can you trade with other countries - 

debt arose - 





 









Every financial institution has

a ledger - or a complete record - containing all the transactions their customers have ever made -  This is one of the services a bank offers - 

When we get payed - we deposit our money in the bank - 


something you should know is that when we deposit our money at the bank - the money seizes 

to be ours and it becomes the banks property - 



this is how they keep track of how much wealth everyone has allowing us to go spend money

with our debit cards

When ordinary individuals get payed - they deposit their money at the bank - When we

deposit our money at the bank we give up ownership over our money - it becomes the banks property - and we trust them that we'll be able to go

withdraw and spend our cash whenever we need to - they handle transfering money around - and in return they get to loan our money 10 times - its

called the fractional reserve system - and thats how banks make money - its also how money is created - Over 90% of the money in the world is now digital - and

most payments are conducted electronically - when you swipe your debit card - when you apple pay - when you use cashapp - Do you know what a bank is ? 

A bank is just a business - they're in the business of creating money - The service businesses provide is handling your money - they'll take care of transfering

the funds around - we trust that the banks will take have our money - and we trust that we can cash out - however not everyone can cash out - banks make money

by loaning our money  - financial reserve 

the financial institutions that hold everyones money each have their own ledgers to keep track of everybodies transactions and move funds around -

We trust that the banks will carry out that service


digital cash

the financial institutions holding everyones cash have digital ledgers to record everybodies transactions - banks provide us the service of 

moving money around - we trust them that they'll pay out - 

have a 
however 


So what gives dollars their value ? If you didn't know - 

The dollar is just a piece of papere backed by the power of the United States Economy - "In God We Trust"  It isn't backed by anything - not even gold

hasn't been for over 50 years - 






A currencys' value derives from believing that it has value - because you determine how valuable something is - 

When you're purchasing something - you determine what and how much of your wealth you're willing to give up for something - vice verse a seller decides what

and how much they're willing to accept for a trade - with every purchase you make - or don't - you're casting a vote for the world you want = 


coins means someone controls your currency

money and political power are linked and centralized

The dollar isn't backed by anything so what gives it its value ? 

But what gives a currency its value? 

how did coins emerge
how did banks emerge


rocks example

What value do these currencies have - if you go into a primary school you see children exchange ____ 

people invent currency when they have no other currency

north korea currency dark market

comoddities that aren't durable are a lousy store of value - bad cacao crop or huge new salt discovery can throw your currency and economy into turmoil


2500 years ago first metal coins in china and turkey - much like comoddities and very durable - sometimes coins are all thats left of civilizations

coins were objective and universal unit of account that allows people to buy goods over vasts regions and the market economy was born 

only if people trusted that the king or emperor who issued them wasn't cheating on the metal content

coins mean an authority now controls the supply of your currency - money and political power were inestrictively linked and centralized

minting coins in a steady and predictable manner allows economic growth and stability - as coins passed from people to peolpe 

people would cut pieces of metal from coin and in fact some taxation the kings were doing was taking  an eight of the coin off

taxes fund castles and military hobbies -financed military campaigns and expensive hobbies - taxes fund government - a living organism 

romans and uk

royal mints were substituting cheaper metals for silver and gold this is called debasement and europes kings made a habit of it

the currency of france was debased every 20 months for 200 years - if no one can trust the gold or silver content ofyour coins how can you trade with other countries

wushu coin in china retained value for 500 years - the solidus in constantinople lasted for 700 years 

international merchants came up with a solution - recognizing a persons debt has value that can be traded or transferred - when those IOUs came from reputable sources

they can be used as a form of money - paper money - this money was not based on hard commodities or metal but instead on someones promise to pay 

families like the miedeci in 15th century florencec acted as clearing houses for these ious

rise of banks 

but what is value? Money's value starts in the mind 

whoms value derives from indoctrination - I say indoctrination because money stopped being real in 1971 when President Nixon took

the U.S. Dollar off the Gold Standard.  These pieces of papers aren't backed by anything anymore - their value comes solely from the government

who calls it consumer purchasing power. 


For starters, most people don't even know that the federal reserve is a private institution - in other words, its not even federal

And it doesn't have any reserves either.  Its a giant ponzi scheme that will inevitably collapse one day - and the fed knows this

They're already working on the next generation of currency, when current one collapses - a new one will rise from the Ashes like a PHEONIX from the tower of babel



So what is money and Why is everything so damn expensive when I go grocery shopping!


game of chess position yourself now 


It's imperative we all learn what crypto currencies are.  As John Whacked McAfee once said "The pandoras box that has been open, you will never get that idea back in the box". <video is john mcafee crypto currency is coming is like the pandoras box>    As a matter
of fact  if you're from the U.S> here's your government telling you the same thing -  U.S. Treasurer of the United States Rosie Rios.  <play rosie rios video>  She even brags about her name being on over 90% of the U.S. Dollars in existence. Yeah those
pieces of paper we all work for, AND SHE'S TELLING YOU THIS IS THE FUTURE

Crypto is a double edge sword that can empower or enslave the population! So it is extremely important we all teach one another and learn about this incredible new technology.  All of us are playing
an important role in creating a better world.  If you want to change the world, start with yourself!  Because you are the world!  Always have an open mind!  For Scientists are nothing more
than normal individuals who are no better than you arguing about truth.  Humans are but biological robots nature gave rise to, we're all a bunch of smart robots with different data sets.  And truth exists, its math! And math doesn't lie.  It can't, it has no emotions.  So before we even tackle what crypto currencies are, we must first learn what money is to begin with.  You can't appreciate crypto currencies until you see the flaws of the current financial system of the world, once you see the flaws in the dollar, 
theres no going back! You're going to be flocking to liquidate everything to stack crypto like all the enligthen nerds.  

So what is money? 
Money is just a database of value, its a technology! We use it to trade wealth, and to keep track of wealth.  The pieces of paper or digital numbers we see in our bank accounts are the medium of exchange we use in the database.  Money - or the medium of exchange -  has taken many shapes and forms throughout history! - For example The ancient Mayans used cacao beans—the principal ingredient in chocolate—as a currency, according to a study published in the journal Economic Anthropology!
THAT WAS THEIR MONEY!!!  And in Asia they used RICE. 
Humans eventually transitioned from trading barter to Raw Metals such as Gold and Silver, which later evolved to Coins because
who their right mind wants to be carrying around huge blocks of Metal, they're heavy as hell.  Heck didn't levi even invent the JEANS because metal was too
heavy? (the pieces of gold)  Then Those coins also transformed.  Next came fiat currencies! The pieces of paper we all know and love! Just 
kidding not love, just know and use. Okay so allow me to explain, what are these pieces of paper?  Well originally these pieces of papers
were supposed to be backed by something! Such as precious metals! Like Gold and Silver!  Ya'll know how when you travel to different countries they have
currency exchanges, or shops that exchange your dollars for their native currency?  For example if you're from the U.S. and you travel to Mexico,
and you take your pieces of paper over there, you can go to currency exchange shop that will trade your dollars for mexican pesos!  In the past, these kinds of exchanges
existed!  But for the precious metals! And that was the birth of Banks!  And you would be able to go cash out your pieces of paper
for metals and vice versa.  They even existed here in the U.S.!  As a matter of fact there used to be multiple currencies here in the U.S.!
Until the federal reserve act passed.  Back in te day, the U.S. Dollar used to be backed by Gold.  The Gold standard had its purpose!  It was important, because it instilled discipline
in government spending.  Once you remove the scarcity aspect of money, governments can fund whatever the fuck they want! And pave way for <drum roll>
inflation! It happened in Venezuela and now they're communist:) 

Ayways lets backtrack a bit.  What the hell is the dollar?  And what in the world is the federal reserve?  Well the Federal Reserve
is actually a private bank!  Owned by a private family!  Like yourself and your family! Except its not your family.  Go ahead and pause the video and meditate on that thought for a bit.  The 
word Federal is only added to create an illusion.  An illusion we all believe.  Trust me there is nothing Federal or Reserve about the
Federal Reserve.  The U.S. Dollar today is no longer backed by anything.  We Trust In GOD.  So what is the Dollar?  The Dollar is what you call
a fiat currency.  So add that new word to your mind to your vocabulary!  Fiat Currencies.  Government issued currencies are called Fiat Currencies.

After World War 2 ended, the whole world got together to set up the new world order.  Prior to World War 2, countries
would move the BIG PIECES OF METALS around the world for payments.  Holy shit that is heavy.  After World War 2 the nations of the world got together and established The Bretton Woods Agreement a system through which a fixed currency exchange rate could be created using gold as the universal standard. The agreement involved representatives from 44 nations and brought about the creation of the International Monetary Fund (IMF) and the World Bank.  The Bretton Woods Agreement and System created a collective international currency exchange regime that lasted from the mid-1940s to the early 1970s. 
The Bretton Woods System required a currency peg to the U.S. dollar which was in turn pegged to the price of gold.
Countries agreed to the Bretton Woods Agreement because back then, the Dollar was just as good as Gold! For it was backed by gold! However the U.S. Government started printing more money than it had gold reserves to back it, countries around the world picked up on this so they started demanding for their gold back and began exchanging their dollars for gold!  


But then in 1971 a historical event happened. President Richard Nixon declared an emergency "temporary" hault in the exchange of dollars for gold.  A Temporary hault that is still active today.  And since then the money printing machine has gone ballistic. <show fed printing money gif here>  Under the current monetary system All money is created as debt.  
The U.S. Government borrows it from the Federal Reserve - and promises to pay it back with interest. The only problem is, 
lets imagine theres only $2 dollars in the world.  Only those $2 dollars exist in the world thats it.  And lets say I loan you the only two dollars that exist in the world, and you promise to pay them back to me with interest!  cmon who are you fooling how are you going to pay me back with interest if theres only 2 dollars in existence!  Where are you going to get another dollar to pay me back the interest?


The answer is YOU CANT! You have to borrow MORE!  In order to pay back the initial loan.  Its literally a ponzi scheme because you can never pay it off.  Its a system that requires you to get deeper and deeper in to debt!

But its okay I guess, if a ponzi scheme is what it took to get humanity where it is today.  
Its okay becase A GOLDEN AGE is upon us!  And this golden will be the direct result of the adoption of DECENTRALIZED distributed ledger technologies!  So Add that word to your vocabulary too! Distributed Ledger Technology, or DLT for short.  DLT is the core technology behind Crypto Currencies.  


<left off here> 

Okay so now that we know what money is

What the hell are crypto currencies? Well first you need to stop thinking of it as simply digital money, because although it is, it is also much more than just digital money!  Its the tokenization of
of EVERYTHING.  By tokenization I mean, putting it on the Distributed Ledger.  The world runs on middle men, and crypto will wipe them out!  And don't worry thats not a bad thing.  
Infact its a VERY good thing for it'll allow people to directly transact with one another! Without the need of middle men.  We all use these middle men everyday!  Who are these middle
men i'm talking about?  Well its THE BANKS! You every time you swipe your card middle men are taking care of business.  And they take a cut of the transaction.  With crypto people will
be able to transact directly with one another withotu the need of middle men! For all trust will lie on the computers and open source programming for the world to see.  Not only that
people will be transacting much more than just money!  For example, you'll be able to tokenize your home! Put it on a distributed ledger and have it be represented by an NFT.  Add that word to your
vocabulary too, NFTs, or none fungible tokens.  NFT's will be much more than just monkey JPEGs.  They can represent your house, your car, your diploma, your ID.  
And since its all on blockchain, its you can verify authenticity! Meaning you wouldn't be able to fake or duplicate the NFT token that represents ownership of ___.(your house your jpeg).
NFT's are very a very exciting technology.  Trust me these are just the tip of the ice berge.  NFT's will also replace all the call of duty, minecraft, and fortnite skins!  Meaning
for the first time ever YOU'LL BE ABLE TO ACTUALLY OWN your digital items!  Have ya'll ever tried the virtual reality?  Virtual real estate is coming and it will be a thing!  
And to purchase all these digital items you'll require crypto currencies.  New markets will emerge!  Despite how terrible the economy might be looking right now
We'll rebound! To new all time highs of human achievement!  You'll see!  Distributed Ledger Technologies will take the world by storm!  Its like the beginning of the internet
all over again!  Because thats exactly what it is.  A whole new internet.  

So how does the technology behind crypto currencies work?  Well at its core its a distributed ledger.  So what exactly is a distributed ledger?
We humans tend to over think things.  Guys crypto isn't as complicated as you may think.  Don't lie to yourselves saying you can't understand it
You can you're just holding yourself back, change your mentality!  Nothing is impossible to learn!  For knowledge is finite.  Again what is a distributed ledger?  Well what is a ledger?
A ledger is like a book that keeps track of all transactions.  It is the database of value that I was talking about.  
Okay so what is a bank?  Open up your bank account on your phone and scroll through all your transactions.  The transactions you're scrolling through
is a digital ledger of the banks!  It is owned and controlled by the banks.  So crypto is just a bank! That ANYONE with access to the internet can access.  
The difference between a bank and a crypto currencie is that the Banks move Dollars and Crypto Currencies move Digital Assets.
Look we have smart phones, smart watches, smart cars, smart homes but no smart money?  Oh wait we do!  Its already manifested into our reality!
Its crypto! Lets get back to how it works.  Each crypto currency has its own protocol - in other words it's own way of doing things.  Since we've all heard of Bitcoin lets explore their protocol.
 


I know we've all heard the phrase "bitcoin is digital gold".  Well i'm here to tell you that Constellation Networks $DAG
is digital oil!  What do I mean by digital oil?  Well  DATA is the new oil in the digital age right?  Well $DAG is the tokenization of DATA.   






What are crypto currencies?
So you're telling me we have smart phones smart televisions smart homes smart toasters
but no smart money?
oh wait we do its ALREADY HEREEEEEEEEEEEEEEEE
A lot of people think its just money, and it is but its much more than just money
Its the tokenization of everything
Well what does tokenization mean? How can you tell the difference between a crypto currency and a token? 
Already these are new vocabulary words that you need to add to your mind
If you know absolutely nothing about crypto but you want to learn and want to know what the hype is all about
then 


Flaws of Money

Bitcoin

Alt Coins
Constellation is the new internet


I know a lot of people say that say "oh I wish I knew about bitcoin before it was big" 
They feel like they missed the train, That its too late to start investing
Well I'm here to remind everyone that THIS IS the beginning 
Some of the trains are still in the station but its not waiting
on anyone its going to take off when it takes off
The universe doesn't care about your thoughts feelings or emotions.  





Crypto Currenies are networks that work together to maintain a distributed ledger 
until now there had never been anything permanent about the internet.  



In the age of information - ignorance is a choice - 

elon musk neuro network internet



There is only one Soul in the Universe. There is no ‘you’ or ‘me’; all variety is merged into the absolute unity, the one infinite existence – God… 
~ Swami Vivekananda ~ “The Complete Works of Swami Vivekananda”, p.4798


“Know yourself and you shall know the gods.” ~ Ancient Egyptian Proverb

“I have said, ye are Gods; and all of you are of the most High.” ~ Christ… (psalms 82:6)

“I searched for God and found only myself. I searched for myself and found only God.” ~ Rumi

“God is a circle whose center is everywhere and circumference nowhere.” ~ Voltaire

“The eye through which I see God is the same eye through which God sees me; my eye and god’s eye are one eye, one seeing , one knowing , one love.” ~ Meister Eckhart

“The highest revelations is that god is in every one.” ~ Ralph Waldo Emerson

“Being infinite, God cannot be limited to any form, human or stone; yet is manifest in all forms.” ~ Paramahansa Yogananda

“In the faces of men and women, I see God.” ~ Walt Whitman

“We are each, all that is and ever will be.” ~ Mynzah





It is the Self who sees, hears, smells, touches, and tastes, who thinks, acts, and is pure consciousness. The Self is Brahman, 
changeless and supreme. Those who know the supreme Self as formless, without shadow, without impurity, know all, gentle friend, and live in all. 
Those who know the Self, the seat of consciousness, in whom the breath and all the senses live, know all, gentle friend, and live in all. 
Those who deny the Lord deny themselves; Those who affirm the Lord affirm themselves.

The Self, pure awareness, shines as the light within the heart, surrounded by the senses. Only seeming to think, seeming to move, 
the Self neither sleeps nor wakes nor dreams. When the Self takes on a body, it seems to assume the body’s frailties and limitations; 
but when God sheds the body at the time of death, the Self leaves all these behind… ~ Brihadaranyaka Upanishad ~
